Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated  to the Water Resources Department, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for the
following purposes:
(1) Administrative services ............  $ 4,830,889
(2) Field services ............................  $ 11,295,859
(3) Water rights and
adjudications............................. $ 3,805,605
(4) Technical services ..................... $ 8,532,235
(5) Director’s office ........................ $ 3,768,034
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$6,032,844 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Water Resources Department for debt service.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and in-
cluding federal funds received under cooperative agreements with or contracts  from the
Bureau of Reclamation of the United States Department of the Interior, the United States
Army Corps of Engineers, the United States Geological Survey,  the Bonneville Power Ad-
ministration and the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation,  but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in  this section, collected or received by the Water Resources
Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Administrative services ............ $ 27,378,266
(2) Field services ............................ $  2,597,849
(3) Water rights and
adjudications............................. $ 4,351,204
(4) Technical services ..................... $ 5,029,658
(5) Director’s office ........................ $ 6,297
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 3 of this 2017 Act, col-
lected or received by the Water Resources Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Field services ............................ $ 616,140
(2) Technical services ..................... $ 1,263,394
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by Senate June 21, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 28, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 2